Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.77.215

Statewide transfer of credit policy and agreement—Requirements.

The statewide transfer of credit policy and agreement must be designed to facilitate the transfer of students and the evaluation of transcripts, to better serve persons seeking information about courses and programs, to aid in academic planning, and to improve the review and evaluation of academic programs in the state institutions of higher education. The statewide transfer of credit policy and agreement must not require or encourage the standardization of course content or prescribe course content or the credit value assigned by any institution to the course. Policies adopted by public four-year institutions of higher education concerning the transfer of lower division credit must treat students transferring from public community colleges the same as students transferring from public four-year institutions of higher education.

[ 2012 c 229 s 114. Prior: 2004 c 55 s 5; 1983 c 304 s 2. Formerly RCW 28B.76.2401, 28B.80.290.]